Nevada, session 83, AB138.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 389.031 is hereby amended to read as follows:
389.031 1. The Department, in consultation with persons and
organizations who possess knowledge and expertise in the teaching
of personal safety of children, shall develop:
(a) Age-appropriate curriculum standards based on best
practices for teaching the personal safety of children to pupils in
kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive.
(b) Age-appropriate curriculum standards based on best
practices for teaching the awareness and prevention of sexual
abuse to pupils in kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive,
including, without limitation:
(1) Methods for increasing awareness among teachers,
pupils and parents, guardians or other caretakers of pupils of
issues regarding the sexual abuse of children, including, without
limitation, recognizing common indicators of sexual abuse;
(2) Actions that a child who is a victim of sexual abuse
should take to obtain assistance and intervention; and
(3) Counseling options that are available to pupils affected
by sexual abuse.
(c) Recommendations to assist a school district or charter school
in developing:
(1) A training plan to ensure that at least one employee at
each school, as designated by the principal, receives training on the
personal safety of children;
(2) Educational materials and information to be distributed to
parents, guardians or other caretakers of pupils regarding the
personal safety of children and how and when to teach and reinforce
concepts and skills of the personal safety of children; and
(3) Policies and procedures for the referral of a child who has
reported or experienced an incident that did or could have
threatened his or her personal safety, and his or her family or
guardian, if appropriate, to various services, including, without
limitation, counseling or any other available services or resources.
[(c)] (d) Recommendations of existing research-based programs
and curriculum samples to be considered for implementation.
2. The Department will review the standards and
recommendations developed pursuant to subsection 1 on an annual
basis to ensure that those standards and recommendations contain
current information.
3. The Department may apply for and accept grants, gifts,
donations, bequests or devises from any public or private source to
carry out the provisions of this section.
-
*AB138*

– 3 –
4. As used in this section, “personal safety of children” means
an age-appropriate recognition of various hazards and dangers that
are particular to children, including, without limitation, the danger
associated with unsafe persons, both known and unknown to the
child, physical and sexual abuse, becoming lost or separated from a
parent or guardian, and an awareness of age-appropriate steps a
child may take to avoid, lessen or alleviate those hazards and
dangers, including, without limitation, reporting threats of harm to a
responsible adult.
Sec. 2. NRS 389.064 is hereby amended to read as follows:
389.064 1. The board of trustees of each school district and
the governing body of each charter school shall ensure that
instruction in the personal safety of children, including, without
limitation, the awareness and prevention of sexual abuse, based on
the standards developed by the Department pursuant to NRS
389.031, be implemented as part of a course of study in health
prescribed pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection 3 of
NRS 389.018.
2. The school district and the charter school, in accordance
with the recommendations provided by the Department pursuant to
subsection 1 of NRS 389.031, shall determine, for the instruction
required by subsection 1:
(a) The content of and materials to be used to provide the
instruction; and
(b) The grade levels in which the instruction will be provided.
3. A person who provides the instruction required by
subsection 1 must be:
(a) A licensed teacher;
(b) An employee of the school district with special knowledge
or training in the teaching of the personal safety of children;
(c) An employee of an agency which has as its primary purpose
the teaching of the personal safety of children;
(d) An employee of a law enforcement agency; or
(e) A volunteer of an agency which has as its primary purpose
the teaching of the personal safety of children and who meets the
requirements of subsection 8.
4. The school district and the charter school shall develop a
procedure for the notification of the parent or guardian of each pupil
to whom the instruction required by subsection 1 is to be provided.
The procedure must inform the parent or guardian that:
(a) The parent or guardian may submit a written request that the
pupil be excused from some or all of the instruction, except when
the instruction is included in a course which is required for
graduation; and
-
*AB138*

– 4 –
(b) All instructional materials to be used in the instruction
required by subsection 1 are available for inspection by the parent or
guardian at reasonable times and locations before the instruction is
provided.
5. A pupil whose parent or guardian submits a written request
pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 4 must be excused from such
instruction without any penalty as to credits or academic standing.
6. The school district and the charter school shall consider the
recommendations developed by the Department pursuant to
paragraph [(b)] (c) of subsection 1 of NRS 389.031 and, to the
extent money is available for this purpose, develop and implement:
(a) A training plan to ensure that all school employees receive
training as to the teaching of the personal safety of children;
(b) Educational materials and information to be distributed to
parents, guardians or other caretakers of pupils regarding the
teaching of the personal safety of children; and
(c) Policies and procedures for the referral of a child who has
reported or experienced an incident that did or could have
threatened his or her personal safety, and his or her family or
guardian, if appropriate, to various services, including, without
limitation, counseling or any other available services or resources.
7. On or before August 1 of each year, each board of trustees
and each governing body shall report to the Department for the
preceding year:
(a) The grade levels in which the instruction required by
subsection 1 was conducted;
(b) The curriculum content and materials distributed and utilized
for the instruction required by subsection 1;
(c) The person, persons or agency utilized to provide the
instruction required by subsection 1; and
(d) The number of reports or disclosures by pupils of incidents
that did or could have threatened their personal safety during the
preceding school year.
8. An agency which has as its primary purpose the teaching of
the personal safety of children, before allowing any volunteer of the
agency to provide instruction pursuant to paragraph (e) of
subsection 3, must ensure that the volunteer has successfully
completed:
(a) A national background check, which must include, without
limitation, a report of the criminal history of the volunteer from the
Federal Bureau of Investigation and the Central Repository for
Nevada Records of Criminal History;
(b) A child abuse and neglect screening through the Statewide
Central Registry for the Collection of Information Concerning the
-
*AB138*

– 5 –
Abuse or Neglect of a Child established pursuant to NRS 432.100;
and
(c) Adequate and appropriate training specific to providing
instruction regarding the personal safety of children.
9. An agency which has as its primary purpose the teaching of
the personal safety of children shall, upon request from a school
district or charter school and to the extent allowed by federal law,
make available to the school district or charter school
documentation of the agency’s conclusions regarding a volunteer’s
successful completion of the requirements of subsection 8.
10. A board of trustees of a school district and a governing
body of a charter school may apply for and accept grants, gifts,
donations, bequests or devises from any public or private source to
carry out the provisions of this section.
11. As used in this section, “personal safety of children” has
the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 389.031.
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB138*